Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-119 Conflicts of interest. No
director, committee member, officer, agent or employee of the credit union
shall in any manner, directly or indirectly, participate in the deliberation
upon or the determination of any question affecting that person's pecuniary
interest or the pecuniary interest of any corporation, partnership, or
association (other than the credit union) in which that person is directly or
indirectly interested. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next